Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF417.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2309XS (3) 91 nls/ko S.F. 417 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 249A.34 Annual lung cancer 1 screenings. 2 1. As used in this section, unless the context requires 3 otherwise: 4 a. âAt-risk individualâ means a recipient fifty years of age 5 or older to which any of the following circumstances apply: 6 (1) The individual has smoked cigarettes regularly or 7 experienced secondhand smoke regularly. 8 (2) The individual has an immediate family member diagnosed 9 with lung cancer. 10 (3) The individual has been regularly exposed to asbestos, 11 radon, arsenic, nickel, chromium, tar, or soot in the 12 individualâs home or workplace. 13 b. âLung cancer screeningâ means a scan of the lungs using 14 low-dose computed tomography. 15 2. The department shall seek any federal waiver necessary 16 for the medical assistance program to provide coverage for 17 an annual lung cancer screening for at-risk individuals. 18 Contingent on receiving approval of a federal waiver, and 19 effective immediately upon receiving approval of a federal 20 waiver, the medical assistance program shall provide coverage 21 for annual lung cancer screenings for at-risk individuals. 22 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 514C.37 Annual lung cancer screening 23 ââ coverage. 24 1. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise 25 requires: 26 a. âAt-risk individualâ means a covered person fifty years 27 of age or older to which any of the following circumstances 28 apply: 29 (1) The individual has smoked cigarettes regularly or 30 experienced secondhand smoke regularly. 31 (2) The individual has an immediate family member diagnosed 32 with lung cancer. 33 (3) The individual has been regularly exposed to asbestos, 34 radon, arsenic, nickel, chromium, tar, or soot in the 35 -1- LSB 2309XS (3) 91 nls/ko 1/ 4 S.F. 417 individualâs home or workplace. 1 b. âCost-sharingâ means any coverage limit, copayment, 2 coinsurance, deductible, or other out-of-pocket expense 3 obligation imposed on a covered person by a policy, contract, 4 or plan providing for third-party payment or prepayment of 5 health or medical expenses. 6 c. âCovered personâ means a policyholder, subscriber, or 7 other person participating in a policy, contract, or plan that 8 provides for third-party payment or prepayment of health or 9 medical expenses. 10 d. âLung cancer screeningâ means a scan of the lungs using 11 low-dose computed tomography. 12 2. Notwithstanding the uniformity of treatment requirements 13 of section 514C.6, a policy, contract, or plan providing for 14 third-party payment or prepayment of health or medical expenses 15 shall provide coverage for an annual lung cancer screening for 16 an at-risk individual. 17 3. Cost-sharing shall not be imposed by a health carrier for 18 coverage required under this section. 19 4. a. This section applies to the following classes of 20 third-party payment provider contracts, policies, or plans 21 delivered, issued for delivery, continued, or renewed in this 22 state on or after January 1, 2026: 23 (1) Individual or group accident and sickness insurance 24 providing coverage on an expense-incurred basis. 25 (2) An individual or group hospital or medical service 26 contract issued pursuant to chapter 509, 514, or 514A. 27 (3) An individual or group health maintenance organization 28 contract regulated under chapter 514B. 29 (4) A plan established for public employees pursuant to 30 chapter 509A. 31 b. This section shall not apply to accident-only, specified 32 disease, short-term hospital or medical, hospital confinement 33 indemnity, credit, dental, vision, Medicare supplement, 34 long-term care, basic hospital and medical-surgical expense 35 -2- LSB 2309XS (3) 91 nls/ko 2/ 4 S.F. 417 coverage as defined by the commissioner of insurance, 1 disability income insurance coverage, coverage issued as a 2 supplement to liability insurance, workersâ compensation or 3 similar insurance, or automobile medical payment insurance. 4 5. The commissioner of insurance may adopt rules pursuant to 5 chapter 17A to administer this section. 6